Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1223
Farm operation, defined.

Farm operation shall mean any activity conducted solely or primarily for the production of one or more agricultural products or commodities, including timber, for sale or home use and customarily producing such products or commodities in sufficient quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator's support.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 10.